Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.090

Certain agencies may register without fee—Not subject to RCW 15.58.180.

All federal, state, and county agencies shall register without fee all pesticides sold by them and they shall not be subject to the license provisions of RCW 15.58.180.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 9.]